North Carolina, session 2025, HB1117.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

TOWN OF BROOKFORD
SECTION 1.(a) Section 3 of the Charter of the Town of Brookford, being Chapter
230 of the Private Laws of 1907, as amended by Chapter 109 of the 1961 Session Laws and
Town Ordinance, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 3. That the officers of the said corporation shall be a mayor, three commissioners and
such other officers and agents as may be appointed by the board of commissioners to enforce
their ordinances, keep their records, and otherwise aid in the conduct of the affairs of the town.
That until Tuesday after the first Monday in May, one thousand nine hundred and seven, T. J.
Leonard is appointed to the office of mayor of said town, and W. H. Shuford, J. W. Ballew and
C. E. Cole are appointed commissioners thereof; that the said mayor and commissioners shall
hold their offices until their successors are elected and qualified, as hereafter provided.The
officers of the Town of Brookford shall be a mayor and four aldermen. The term of office for
mayor shall be four years. The terms of office for the aldermen shall be four-year staggered
terms."
SECTION 1.(b) Section 4 of the Charter of the Town of Brookford, being Chapter
230 of the Private Laws of 1907, as amended by Chapter 109 of the 1961 Session Laws and
Town Ordinance, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 4. That there shall be an election to the offices of mayor and commissioners of said
town on Tuesday after the first Monday in May, one thousand nine hundred and seven, and
biennially thereafter, under the same restrictions and regulations under which Shate and county
elections are held, and as provided by law for elections in cities and towns in North
Carolina.Regular municipal elections for officers in the Town of Brookford shall be held at the
time of the general election in each even-numbered year. The election shall be conducted on a
nonpartisan plurality basis and the results determined in accordance with G.S. 163-292. Except
as otherwise provided, the election shall be conducted in accordance with the uniform municipal
election laws in Chapter 163 of the General Statutes."
SECTION 1.(c) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of Brookford
in 2027. The terms of office for the two Aldermen in the Town of Brookford serving on the
effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be extended by one year.
*H1117-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
The terms of office for the Mayor and two Aldermen in the Town of Brookford serving on the
effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2029 shall be extended by one year.
Regular municipal elections in the Town of Brookford shall resume in even-numbered years
beginning in 2028 with the same staggering of terms as when elections were conducted in the
odd-numbered years.

TOWN OF CATAWBA
SECTION 2.(a) Section 4 of the Charter of the Town of Catawba, being Chapter
274 of the Private Laws of 1893, as amended by Chapter 333 of the 1951 Session Laws, Chapter
224 of the 1965 Session Laws, Town Ordinance No. 02-10 adopted on July 1, 2002, and Town
Ordinance No. 2006-15 adopted on November 6, 2006, and referred to as Section 5 in the current
amended Town Code, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 5. Elections.
…
(b) Elections shall be conducted on the first Tuesday of November in odd-numbered
even-numbered years as provided by the laws of North Carolina.
…
(d) The mayor shall be elected every four years, for a term of four years, beginning with the
regular municipal election in 2007.years.
…."
SECTION 2.(b) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of Catawba
in 2027. The terms of office for the Mayor and two Council members in the Town of Catawba
serving on the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be
extended by one year. The terms of office for the two Council members in the Town of Catawba
serving on the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2029 shall be
extended by one year. Regular municipal elections in the Town of Catawba shall resume in
even-numbered years beginning in 2028 with the same staggering of terms as when elections
were conducted in the odd-numbered years.

CITY OF CLAREMONT
SECTION 3.(a) Section 3 of the Charter of the City of Claremont, being Chapter 11
of the Private Laws of 1893, as amended by Chapter 76 of the 1961 Session Laws, Chapter 97 of
the 1975 Session Laws, S.L. 2005-54, and Town Ordinance adopted on February 3, 1976, reads
as rewritten:
"Sec. 3. Elections; Terms of mayor and councilmen.Council members.
(a) At the regular annual election of city officers in May, 1961, in the City of Claremont, the
qualified voters shall elect a mayor and five (5) councilmen.The governing body for the City of
Claremont shall consist of a mayor and five council members, elected to serve four-year
staggered terms. Regular municipal elections shall be held at the time of the general election in
each even-numbered year. Council members for the City of Claremont shall be elected on a
nonpartisan plurality basis and the results determined in accordance with G.S. 163-292. Except
as otherwise provided, the election shall be conducted in accordance with the uniform municipal
election laws in Chapter 163 of the General Statutes.
(b) The mayor to be elected in 2005 shall shall be elected to serve for a term of four years or
until a successor is duly elected and qualified. Thereafter, a mayor shall be elected every four
years in the odd-numbered years and the term of office shall be four years.
(c) Of the five (5) councilmen now holding office in the City of Claremont, Catawba County,
successors to the offices now held by Harold McRee Wilson, Eddy Gaither Harwell, and William
David Watts shall be elected at the November, 1975, election, and every four (4) years thereafter,
for the City of Claremont and shall serve for terms of four (4) years or until their successors are
elected and qualified. Successors to the offices now held by Timothy Allan Lowrance and Gary
Page 2 House Bill 1117-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Wayne Carpenter shall be elected at the regular November, 1977, election, and every four (4)
years thereafter, for the City of Claremont and shall serve for terms of four (4) years or until their
successors are elected and qualified. The terms of office of Timothy Allan Lowrance and Gary
Wayne Carpenter are hereby extended to November, 1977, or until their successors are elected
and qualified. Thereafter, as the terms of office expire, councilmen Council members elected at
regular town City elections shall serve for terms of four (4) years or until their successors are
duly elected and qualified."
SECTION 3.(b) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the City of Claremont
in 2027. The terms of office for the three Council members in the City of Claremont serving on
the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be extended by one
year. The terms of office for the Mayor and two Council members in the City of Claremont
serving on the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2029 shall be
extended by one year. Regular municipal elections in the City of Claremont shall resume in
even-numbered years beginning in 2028 with the same staggering of terms as when elections
were conducted in the odd-numbered years.

CITY OF CONOVER
SECTION 4.(a) Section 4.01 of the Charter of the City of Conover, being Chapter
78 of the 1977 Session Laws, as amended by City Ordinance No. 16-96 adopted July 8, 1996,
reads as rewritten:
"Section 4.01. Conduct of city elections. Regular municipal elections shall be held at the time
of the general election in each even-numbered year. All elections for mayor and council shall be
held on a nonpartisan basis and the results determined by plurality as provided in G.S. 163-
279(a)(1). G.S. 163-292. The term of office of the mayor shall be four (4) years. The terms of
office of councilmen Council members shall be four years. At the regular election in November,
1997, and quadrennially thereafter, two councilmen and the mayor shall be elected. At the regular
election in November, 1979, and quadrennially thereafter, three councilmen shall be elected.
four-year staggered terms. The elections for the City of Conover shall be held and conducted
pursuant to the applicable provisions of Articles 23 and 24 of in accordance with the uniform
municipal election laws in Chapter 163 of the General Statutes of North Carolina.Statutes, except
as otherwise provided."
SECTION 4.(b) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the City of Conover
in 2027. The terms of office for the three Council members in the City of Conover serving on the
effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be extended by one year.
The terms of office for the Mayor and two Council members in the City of Conover serving on
the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2029 shall be extended by one
year. Regular municipal elections in the City of Conover shall resume in even-numbered years
beginning in 2028 with the same staggering of terms as when elections were conducted in the
odd-numbered years.

CITY OF HICKORY
SECTION 5.(a) Section 2.01 of the Charter of the City of Hickory, being Chapter
323 of the 1961 Session Laws, as amended by Chapter 404 of the 1967 Session Laws, reads as
rewritten:
"Sec. 2.01. Composition, Election, and Terms of Mayor and City Council; Time of General
Election. (a) The voters of the city shall elect a mayor and six aldermen. council members. The
mayor shall be nominated and elected at large. The aldermen council members shall be
nominated by wards and elected at large. The candidate from each ward receiving the highest
number of votes shall be declared elected. Except as is otherwise provided in this Charter, no two
aldermen council members shall be residents of the same ward. All municipal elections shall be
nonpartisan.
House Bill 1117-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) A general municipal election shall be held on the first Monday in June of 1967, and
on the first Monday in June of 1968. In 1970, and biennially thereafter, the general municipal
election shall be held on the first Monday in June.Regular municipal elections shall be held at
the time of the general election in each even-numbered year. The mayor and aldermen shall be
elected on a nonpartisan primary basis and the results determined in accordance with
G.S. 163-294. Except as otherwise provided, the elections for the City of Hickory shall be held
and conducted in accordance with the uniform municipal election laws in Chapter 163 of the
General Statutes.
(c) The terms of all council members shall begin at the day and hour prescribed by
Section 3.03 of this Charter for the taking of the oath of office, and shall run for a period of four
years, except for member's interim terms of three years for the next election of aldermen of the
fourth, fifth, and sixth wards. This Section shall apply to elections coming in 1967. Members
shall serve until their successors are elected and qualified. In the event that it is not possible
otherwise to determine which of two or more persons should be considered a hold-over alderman,
decision shall be made by lot between the aldermen who are willing to serve, the lots to be cast
under the supervision of the mayor and the remaining qualified aldermen.The mayor shall be
elected for a term of four years. The terms of office of council members shall be four-year
staggered terms."
SECTION 5.(b) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the City of Hickory
in 2027. The terms of office for the three Council members in the City of Hickory serving on the
effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be extended by one year.
The terms of office for the Mayor and three Council members in the City of Hickory serving on
the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2029 shall be extended by one
year. Regular municipal elections in the City of Hickory shall resume in even-numbered years
beginning in 2028 with the same staggering of terms as when elections were conducted in the
odd-numbered years.

TOWN OF LONG VIEW
SECTION 6.(a) Section 3 of the Charter of the Town of Long View, being Chapter
430 of the Private Laws of 1907, as amended by Chapter 131 of the Private Laws of 1929,
Chapter 789 of the 1955 Session Laws, and Motion of Town Board of Aldermen Meeting on
January 3, 1978, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 3. Town Elections.
(a) The governing body for the Town of Long View shall consist of a mayor and five
aldermen. The mayor shall be nominated and elected by the voters at large for a four-year term
and shall serve until a successor is elected and qualified. Each ward of the Town of Long View
shall be represented on the board of aldermen by one alderman, who must be a resident of that
ward and nominated and elected by that ward. The aldermen shall serve four-year staggered terms
and until their successors are elected and qualified.
The Town of Long View shall be divided into five wards as follows:
…
(b) Regular municipal elections shall be held at the time of the general election in each
even-numbered year. The mayor and aldermen shall be elected on a nonpartisan plurality basis
and the results determined in accordance with G.S. 163-292. Except as otherwise provided, the
elections for the Town of Long View shall be held and conducted in accordance with the uniform
municipal election laws in Chapter 163 of the General Statutes."
SECTION 6.(b) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of Long
View in 2027. The terms of office for the three Aldermen in the Town of Long View serving on
the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be extended by one
year. The terms of office for the Mayor and two Aldermen in the Town of Long View serving on
the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2029 shall be extended by one
Page 4 House Bill 1117-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
year. Regular municipal elections in the Town of Long View shall resume in even-numbered
years beginning in 2028 with the same staggering of terms as when elections were conducted in
the odd-numbered years.

TOWN OF MAIDEN
SECTION 7.(a) Section 4 of the Charter of the Town of Maiden, being Chapter 103
of the Private Laws of 1883, as amended by Chapter 445 of the 1955 Session Laws, Town
Ordinance No. 3-76 adopted on April 5, 1976, and Ordinance No. 11-2006 adopted on April 3,
2006, reads as rewritten:
"Section 4. Elections.
…
(b) Elections shall be conducted on the first Tuesday of November in odd-numbered
even-numbered years as provided by the Laws of North Carolina.
(c) Election of the Mayor and Council shall be on a nonpartisan plurality basis and the
following rules shall be utilized in determining those elected: (1) When more than one person is
seeking election to a single office, the candidate who receives the highest number of votes shall
be declared elected. (2) When more persons are seeking election to two or more offices
(constituting a group) than there are offices to be filled, those candidates receiving the highest
number of votes equal in number to the number of offices to be filled, shall be declared elected.
(3) If two or more candidates receiving the highest number of votes each receive the same number
of votes, the board of elections shall determine the winner by lot.results determined in accordance
with G.S. 163-292. Except as otherwise provided, the elections for the Town of Maiden shall be
held and conducted in accordance with the uniform municipal election laws in Chapter 163 of
the General Statutes.
(d) The term of office for the Mayor shall be two (2) years.
(e) The term of office for the Council shall be determined as follows: (1) Election in 1975 to
provide that the two candidates receiving the first and second largest number of votes to serve
four-year terms; (2) Election in 1975 to provide that the three candidates receiving the third,
fourth, and fifth largest number of votes to serve two-year terms; (3) Election in 1977 to provide
that the two candidates receiving the first and second largest number of votes to serve four-year
terms; (4) Election in 1977 to provide that the candidate receiving the third largest number of
votes to serve a two-year term; (5) Election in all odd-numbered years after 1977 to provide that
staggered such that during the regular municipal election in each even-numbered year, three
council members shall be elected with the two candidates receiving the first and second largest
number of votes to serve four-year terms; terms and the candidate receiving the third largest
number of votes to serve a two-year term."
SECTION 7.(b) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of Maiden
in 2027. The terms of office for the Mayor and two Council members in the Town of Maiden
serving on the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be
extended by one year. The terms of office for three Council members in the Town of Maiden
serving on the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2029 shall be
extended by one year. Regular municipal elections in the Town of Maiden shall resume in
even-numbered years beginning in 2028 with the same staggering of terms as when elections
were conducted in the odd-numbered years.

CITY OF NEWTON
SECTION 8.(a) Article III of the Charter of the City of Newton, being Chapter 1042
of the 1989 Session Laws, as amended by City Ordinance No. 2002.29 adopted on July 10, 2002,
reads as rewritten:
"ARTICLE III. GOVERNING BODY.
House Bill 1117-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"Section 3.1. Structure of Governing Body; Number of Members. The Governing Body
of the City of Newton is the Board of Aldermen, City Council, which has six members, and the
Mayor.
"Section 3.2. Manner of Election of Board. Council. The qualified voters of the entire
City elect the members of the Board.Council.
"Section 3.3. Term of Office of Members of the Board. Council. Members of the Board
Council are elected to four-year staggered terms. In 1991 and each four years thereafter, three
members of the Board shall be elected. In 1993 and each four years thereafter, three members of
the Board shall be elected.
"Section 3.4. Election of Mayor; Term of Office. The qualified voters of the entire City
elect the Mayor. A new Mayor shall be elected in 1991 and each two years thereafter.Mayor,
who shall serve a four-year term."
SECTION 8.(b) Section 4.1 of the Charter of the City of Newton, being Chapter
1042 of the 1989 Session Laws, reads as rewritten:
"Section 4.1. Conduct of City Elections. Regular municipal elections shall be held at the
time of the general election in each even-numbered year. City officers shall be elected on a
nonpartisan basis and the results determined by plurality, as provided by G.S. 163-292."
SECTION 8.(c) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the City of Newton in
2027. The terms of office for the Mayor and three Council members in the City of Newton serving
on the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be extended by
one year. The terms of office for the three Council members in the City of Newton serving on
the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2029 shall be extended by one
year. Regular municipal elections in the City of Newton shall resume in even-numbered years
beginning in 2028 with the same staggering of terms as when elections were conducted in the
odd-numbered years.

EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 9. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to elections held
on or after that date.
Page 6 House Bill 1117-First Edition